Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6690XS (2) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2349 Section 1. Section 468.27, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. When the county auditor first receives either the survey 3 and report, or a permanent survey, plat, and profile, as 4 provided in subsection 2 , the county auditor shall prepare and 5 file with the county recorder , or make available on a public 6 internet site, a district parcel record that identifies all 7 parcels contained within the district that is part of the 8 county. The parcel record filed by the county auditor with the 9 county recorder must also include the legal description, parcel 10 identification number, if known, and names of the owners as 11 shown in transfer books in the office of the auditor, for each 12 forty-acre tract or fraction thereof. The county auditor shall 13 provide the county recorder with any amendment to the district 14 parcel record within a reasonable period after receiving the 15 amendment. A county shall not charge a district a filing fee 16 or any other cost or expense under this subsection , including 17 an expense described in section 468.154 . 18